Arkansas, session 2025, HB1023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-81-1604(b), concerning the standards for
loan repayments under the State Teacher Education Program, is amended to read
as follows:
(b) The division shall adopt standards for awarding the loan
repayments to a public school teacher with an Arkansas teacher's license an
applicant who is eligible to participate in the program under § 6-81-1605
teaching in a:
(1) Subject area with a teacher shortage; or
(2) Geographic area with teacher shortage.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-81-1605 is amended to read as follows:
*TNL010*
01-16-2025 16:02:53 TNL010

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1023
6-81-1605. Eligibility.
To be eligible for the State Teacher Education Program, an applicant
shall:
(1) Teach full-time at:
(A) At a public school district in a subject area or
geographic area with a teacher shortage, as identified by the Division of
Higher Education in consultation with the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education; or
(B) In a public early childhood education program that
serves children whose ages may range from birth through prekindergarten;
(2) Hold Either:
(A) Hold a valid Arkansas teacher's license; or
(B) Hold a birth through prekindergarten teaching
credential from the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education of
the Department of Human Services; and
(3)(A) Meet additional continuing eligibility criteria
established by the Division of Higher Education.
(B) An individual who has earned a teaching license upon
the successful completion of an alternative educator preparation program is
an eligible student under this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-81-1606(a), concerning loan repayments
under the State Teacher Education Program, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The State Teacher Education Program shall be used to provide a
loan repayment for federal student loans in the amount of six thousand
dollars ($6,000) ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per year for a maximum of
three (3) five (5) years for a licensed teacher who graduated from a teacher
education program after April 2004 and teaches in a public school in this
state or successfully completed an alternative educator preparation program
after April 2004 and teaches in a public school in the State Teacher
Education Program:
(A) In a subject area designated by the Division of Higher
Education in consultation with the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education as having a critical shortage of teachers; and
(B) Located in a geographical area of the state designated
by the Division of Higher Education in consultation with the Division of
01-16-2025 16:02:53 TNL010

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1023
Elementary and Secondary Education as having a critical shortage of teachers
an individual who is eligible to participate in the program under § 6-81-
1605.
(2) A licensed teacher who is given intensive support status
under the Teacher Excellence and Support System, § 6-17-2801 et seq., shall
be ineligible for receipt of funds under the State Teacher Education Program
program for the school year.

/s/A. Collins



























01-16-2025 16:02:53 TNL010